Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.221

Washington professional educator standards board—Revision of STEM-related subject-area teacher endorsements.

The professional educator standards board shall, in its regular review and revision of teacher certification standards as required by RCW 28A.410.210, revise standards for the elementary education endorsement and middle level and secondary mathematics and science teacher endorsements as well as other subject area endorsements with STEM-related components. Standards revisions related to mathematics shall be adopted by September 1, 2013. Standards revisions related to science shall be adopted by September 1, 2014. The revised standards shall include the integration of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) knowledge and skill and be aligned, as appropriate, with common core mathematics standards, the 2009 [2008] revision of state mathematics student learning standards and performance expectations, the biology end-of-course assessment, and the 2012 student science learning standards developed from the conceptual framework for science education and next generation standards and related student performance expectations. In addition to appropriate mathematics and science content, the endorsement standards must also include the concepts and instructional practices of the interdisciplinary connections with engineering and technology.

[ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1.]